Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.315

Immunity of director, the state, licensed driver training schools, and school districts in administering knowledge and driving portions of driver licensing examination.

A civil suit or action may not be commenced or prosecuted against the director, the state of Washington, any driver training school licensed by the department, any other government officer or entity, including a school district or an employee of a school district, or against any other person, by reason of any act done or omitted to be done in connection with administering the portions of the driver licensing examination that test the applicant's knowledge of traffic laws and ability to safely operate a motor vehicle. This section does not bar the state of Washington or the director from bringing any action, whether civil or criminal, against any driver training school licensed by the department.

[ 2011 c 370 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2011 c 370: See note following RCW 28A.220.030.

Inclusion of stakeholder groups in communications to facilitate transition of driver licensing examination administration—2011 c 370: See note following RCW 46.82.450.